Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-475
Officers; entry and inspection authorized.

Any officer authorized to enforce the Game Law may, at any time, enter an aquaculture facility for the purpose of inspecting the facility or for the purpose of enforcing the Game Law.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VII, § 11, p. 441;

C.S.1929, § 37-711;

R.S.1943, § 37-711;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 47;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 19;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-711;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 185;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 54.